Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5898.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "citizen's advisory working group act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Group" means the citizen's advisory working group created in section 5. (b) "Impacted community" means a city, township, or village in this state that has at least 1 official MPART PFAS site within its boundaries. (c) "MPART" means the Michigan PFAS action response team created under section 5 of the Michigan PFAS action response team act. (d) "Official MPART PFAS site" means a property where the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy has a valid groundwater monitoring well sample result that exceeds 1 or more of this state's 7 PFAS groundwater cleanup criteria, and based on data, the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy has determined the property is the location of the source of PFAS contamination. (e) "PFAS" means a perfluoroalkyl or polyfluoroalkyl substance and includes any member of the class of fluorinated organic chemicals that contains at least 1 fully fluorinated carbon atom. Sec. 5. (1) The citizen's advisory working group is created in the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy. Each member of the group must be a current or former resident of an impacted community or have been otherwise exposed to PFAS contamination. (2) The group shall conduct its business in compliance with the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. A writing that is prepared, owned, used, possessed, or retained by the group in performing an official function is subject to the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (3) A member of the group is not entitled to compensation for service in the group, but may be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in serving. Sec. 7. The group shall do all of the following: (a) Advise and assist MPART on performing community outreach. (b) Provide input to MPART regarding PFAS contamination. (c) Review existing MPART strategies and recommend new strategies. (d) Make recommendations to MPART on how to improve awareness of public health risks and responses to PFAS. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02653'25) or House Bill No. 5897 (request no. H02653'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.